District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.07a

GPS data use feasibility assessment.

Within 60 days of October 22, 2012, the Commission shall transmit an assessment to the Council regarding the feasibility of making data collected from taxi GPS systems available to the public in an anonymous format for the purpose of developing software tools that may be useful to taxi customers, drivers, or others affected by taxi operations.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 8a
as added Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(h), 59 DCR 9431
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 added this section.
2001 Ed., § 50-307.01.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.